Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 4. Collections of Assets

§ 13-4-401.
General powers and duties of commissioner.

After taking possession of the bank the state banking commissioner may collect money due the bank, perform acts necessary to preserve its assets and business and shall proceed to liquidate the bank’s affairs except as otherwise provided. The state banking commissioner shall collect all claims belonging to the bank. Upon the order of the district court in the judicial district in which the bank is located the state banking commissioner may sell or compound all doubtful debts and may sell all the real estate and personal property of the bank on the terms the court directs. The state banking commissioner shall execute and deliver to the purchaser of bank property the instruments necessary to evidence the passing of the title. If the real estate is situated outside the county in which the office of the bank was located a certified copy of the order authorizing the sale shall be filed in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the property is situated. The state banking commissioner may enforce the individual liability of the stockholders.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 91; R.S. 1931, § 10-512; C.S. 1945, § 35-517; W.S. 1957, § 13-143; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

No authority to borrow. —

District courts had no jurisdiction to authorize state examiner (now commissioner) to borrow money from the reconstruction finance corporation for payment of dividends to depositors. State ex rel. Richmond v. District Court, 45 Wyo. 29, 14 P.2d 673,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1932).

§ 13-4-402.
Notice to creditors.

The state banking commissioner shall give notice in newspapers as he may direct weekly for three (3) consecutive months, notifying persons who may have claims against the bank to present them to the state banking commissioner and to make legal proof of the claims at a place and a time not earlier than the last day of publication specified in the notice. The state banking commissioner shall mail a similar notice to all persons whose names appear as creditors upon the books of the bank.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 92; R.S. 1931, § 10-513; C.S. 1945, § 35-518; W.S. 1957, § 13-144; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-4-403.
Reports; inspection and filing.

After taking possession of the assets of a bank, the state banking commissioner shall make and file the following reports:

An inventory of the assets of the bank;

After the deadline for the presentation of claims, a complete list of the claims presented and indicating the claims rejected;

Supplemental lists showing all claims presented subsequent to the filing of the first list to be filed at least fifteen (15) days before the declaration of any dividend and at intervals not exceeding six (6) months.

The inventory and list of claims shall be open at all reasonable times for inspection. One (1) copy of the inventory and list of claims shall be filed in the office of the state banking commissioner and one (1) copy filed in the office of the clerk of the district court for the county where the bank was located.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 94; R.S. 1931, § 10-515; C.S. 1945, § 35-524; W.S. 1957, § 13-150; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-4-404.
Rejection of claims; allowance of late claims.

If the state banking commissioner doubts the validity of any claim he may reject it and serve notice of the rejection upon the claimants either by mail or personally. An affidavit of the service of the notice, which is prima facie evidence of the service, shall be filed in his office. An action upon a rejected claim must be brought within six (6) months after the service. Claims presented and allowed after the expiration of the time fixed in the notice to creditors shall be paid the amount of all prior dividends if there are sufficient funds and share equitably in the distribution of the remaining assets in the hands of the state banking commissioner.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 92; R.S. 1931, § 10-513; C.S. 1945, § 35-518; W.S. 1957, § 13-144; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

Sufficiency of pleadings upon rejection of claims. —

Petition against liquidating examiner in charge of debtor bank (now commissioner), alleging that plaintiff's claim against bank was rejected by the examiner (now commissioner), was sufficient without pleading that proof of claim was offered before the examiner and without attaching copy of the claim filed with the examiner (now commissioner). Lander State Bank v. Nottingham, 37 Wyo. 50, 259 P. 181,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1927).

Petition alleging a loan to the bank evidenced by a note and guaranty, nonpayment of the loan, claim made and rejection of claim stated a cause of action for money had and received, notwithstanding note and guaranty evidencing the loan might be invalid. Lander State Bank v. Nottingham, 37 Wyo. 50, 259 P. 181,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1927).

Judgment directing pro rata payment

of debtor's preferred claim along with those of other depositors similarly situated was proper, notwithstanding such other depositors had not filed suit to have their claims, which had been allowed as general claims, allowed as preferred claims. Roy E. Hays Co. v. Wilde, 49 Wyo. 486, 57 P.2d 105,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 1936).

§ 13-4-405.
Objection to claims not rejected.

Objection to any claim not rejected by the state banking commissioner may be made by any interested party by filing a copy of the objection with the state banking commissioner, who shall present the objection to the district court after giving written notice to the party filing the objection setting forth the time and place of the presentation. The court shall hear the objections to the claim, refer it to a referee or direct that the issues be tried before a jury. The court may make proper provision for unproved or unclaimed deposits.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 97; R.S. 1931, § 10-518; C.S. 1945, § 35-529; W.S. 1957, § 13-155; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

Judgment directing pro rata payment

of debtor's preferred claim along with those of other depositors similarly situated was proper, notwithstanding such other depositors had not filed suit to have their claims, which had been allowed as general claims, allowed as preferred claims. Roy E. Hays Co. v. Wilde, 49 Wyo. 486, 57 P.2d 105,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 1936).

§ 13-4-406.
Deposit of money collected.

Moneys collected by the state banking commissioner shall be deposited in one (1) or more banks subject to his order and protected by bond in the same manner as deposits of public funds.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 95; R.S. 1931, § 10-516; C.S. 1945, § 35-525; W.S. 1957, § 13-151; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.